test/src/dict-gt-yamls/V-Clex_tuhhid_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
  Verb - tuhhiđ: # 
    tuhhiđ+V+Inf: tuhhiđ
    tuhhiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tuhhiim
    tuhhiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: tuhhiih
    tuhhiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tohhee
    tuhhiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: tohhejeen
    tuhhiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: tuhhiivettee
    tuhhiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: tuhhiv
    tuhhiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: tuhhip
    tuhhiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: tuhhiivetteđ
    tuhhiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: tohhejeh
    tuhhiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: tohhejim
    tuhhiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: tohhejih
    tuhhiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: tuhhij
    tuhhiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: tuhhijm
    tuhhiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: tuhhijd
    tuhhiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: tuhhijn
    tuhhiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: tuhhijm
    tuhhiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: tuhhijd
    tuhhiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: tohhejii
    tuhhiđ+V+Cond+Sg1: tuhhiiččim
    tuhhiđ+V+Cond+Sg2: tuhhiiččih
    tuhhiđ+V+Cond+Sg3: tuhhiiččij
    tuhhiđ+V+Cond+Du1: tuhhiiččáim
    tuhhiđ+V+Cond+Du2: tuhhiiččáid
    tuhhiđ+V+Cond+Du3: tuhhiiččáin
    tuhhiđ+V+Cond+Pl1: tuhhiiččijm
    tuhhiđ+V+Cond+Pl2: tuhhiiččijd
    tuhhiđ+V+Cond+Pl3: tuhhiiččii
    tuhhiđ+V+Pot+Sg1: tuhhiižeem
    tuhhiđ+V+Pot+Sg2: tuhhiižeeh
    tuhhiđ+V+Pot+Sg3: tuhhiš            # tuhhiž
    tuhhiđ+V+Pot+Du1: tuhhiižeen
    tuhhiđ+V+Pot+Du2: tuhhišvettee      # tuhhižvettee 
    tuhhiđ+V+Pot+Du3: tuhhiižává
    tuhhiđ+V+Pot+Pl1: tuhhiižep
    tuhhiđ+V+Pot+Pl2: tuhhišvetteđ      # tuhhižvetteđ 
    tuhhiđ+V+Pot+Pl3: tuhhiižeh
    tuhhiđ+V+Imprt+Sg1: tohhejum
    tuhhiđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: tuhhii
    tuhhiđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: tohhejus
    tuhhiđ+V+Imprt+Du1: tohhejoon
    tuhhiđ+V+Imprt+Du2: tohhejee
    tuhhiđ+V+Imprt+Du3: tohhejus
    tuhhiđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: tohhejop
    tuhhiđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: tuhhiđ
    tuhhiđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: tohejus
    tuhhiđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: tuhhii
    tuhhiđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: tuhhim
    tuhhiđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: tuhhiiččii
    tuhhiđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: tuhhiižii
    tuhhiđ+V+PrsPrc: [tohhejeijee, tohhejijjee]
    tuhhiđ+V+PrfPrc: tuhhim
    tuhhiđ+V+Actio: tuhhim
    tuhhiđ+V+Actio+Ess: tuhhiimin
    tuhhiđ+V+Actio+Loc: tuhhiimist
    tuhhiđ+V+Actio+Ill: tuhhiimân
    tuhhiđ+V+Ger: tuhhiidijn
    tuhhiđ+V+VAbess: tuhhiihánnáá
    
    
      Verb - čolliđ: # 
    čolliđ+V+Inf: čolliđ
    čolliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čolliim
    čolliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: čolliih
    čolliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuálˊlee
    čolliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: čuálˊlejeen
    čolliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: čolliivettee
    čolliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: čolliv
    čolliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: čollip
    čolliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: čolliivetteđ
    čolliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: čuálˊlejeh
    čolliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: čuálˊlejim
    čolliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: čuálˊlejih
    čolliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: čollij
    čolliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: čollijm
    čolliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: čollijd
    čolliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: čollijn
    čolliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: čollijm
    čolliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: čollijd
    čolliđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: čuálˊlejii
    čolliđ+V+Cond+Sg1: čolliiččim
    čolliđ+V+Cond+Sg2: čolliiččih
    čolliđ+V+Cond+Sg3: čolliiččij
    čolliđ+V+Cond+Du1: čolliiččáim
    čolliđ+V+Cond+Du2: čolliiččáid
    čolliđ+V+Cond+Du3: čolliiččáin
    čolliđ+V+Cond+Pl1: čolliiččijm
    čolliđ+V+Cond+Pl2: čolliiččijd
    čolliđ+V+Cond+Pl3: čolliiččii
    čolliđ+V+Pot+Sg1:  čolliižeem
    čolliđ+V+Pot+Sg2:  čolliižeeh
    čolliđ+V+Pot+Sg3:  čolliš           # čolliž
    čolliđ+V+Pot+Du1:  čolliižeen
    čolliđ+V+Pot+Du2:  čollišvettee     # čolližvettee
    čolliđ+V+Pot+Du3:  čolliižává
    čolliđ+V+Pot+Pl1:  čolliižep
    čolliđ+V+Pot+Pl2:  čollišvetteđ     # čolližvetteđ
    čolliđ+V+Pot+Pl3:  čolliižeh
    čolliđ+V+Imprt+Sg1: čuálˊlejum
    čolliđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: čollii
    čolliđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: čuálˊlejus
    čolliđ+V+Imprt+Du1: čuálˊlejoon
    čolliđ+V+Imprt+Du2: čuálˊlejee
    čolliđ+V+Imprt+Du3: čuálˊlejus
    čolliđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: čuálˊlejop
    čolliđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: čolliđ
    čolliđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: čuálˊlejus
    čolliđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: čollii
    čolliđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: čollim
    čolliđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: čolliiččii
    čolliđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: čolliižii
    čolliđ+V+PrsPrc: [čuálˊlejeijee, čuálˊlejijjee]
    čolliđ+V+PrfPrc: čollim
    čolliđ+V+Actio: čollim
    čolliđ+V+Actio+Ess: čolliimin
    čolliđ+V+Actio+Loc: čolliimist
    čolliđ+V+Actio+Ill: čolliimân
    čolliđ+V+Ger: čolliidijn
    čolliđ+V+VAbess: čolliihánnáá
    
    
      Verb - čurgiđ: # 
    čurgiđ+V+Inf: čurgiđ
    čurgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čurgiim
    čurgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: čurgiih
    čurgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čorgee
    čurgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: čorgejeen
    čurgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: čurgiivettee
    čurgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: čurgiv
    čurgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: čurgip
    čurgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: čurgiivetteđ
    čurgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: čorgejeh
    čurgiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: čorgejim
    čurgiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: čorgejih
    čurgiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: čurgij
    čurgiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: čurgijm
    čurgiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: čurgijd
    čurgiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: čurgijn
    čurgiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: čurgijm
    čurgiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: čurgijd
    čurgiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: čorgejii
    čurgiđ+V+Cond+Sg1: čurgiiččim
    čurgiđ+V+Cond+Sg2: čurgiiččih
    čurgiđ+V+Cond+Sg3: čurgiiččij
    čurgiđ+V+Cond+Du1: čurgiiččáim
    čurgiđ+V+Cond+Du2: čurgiiččáid
    čurgiđ+V+Cond+Du3: čurgiiččáin
    čurgiđ+V+Cond+Pl1: čurgiiččijm
    čurgiđ+V+Cond+Pl2: čurgiiččijd
    čurgiđ+V+Cond+Pl3: čurgiiččii
    čurgiđ+V+Pot+Sg1: čurgiižeem
    čurgiđ+V+Pot+Sg2: čurgiižeeh
    čurgiđ+V+Pot+Sg3: čurgiš            # čurgiž
    čurgiđ+V+Pot+Du1: čurgiižeen        
    čurgiđ+V+Pot+Du2: čurgišvettee      # čurgižvettee
    čurgiđ+V+Pot+Du3: čurgiižává
    čurgiđ+V+Pot+Pl1: čurgiižep
    čurgiđ+V+Pot+Pl2: čurgišvetteđ      # čurgižvetteđ
    čurgiđ+V+Pot+Pl3: čurgiižeh
    čurgiđ+V+Imprt+Sg1: čorgejum
    čurgiđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: čurgii
    čurgiđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: čorgejus
    čurgiđ+V+Imprt+Du1: čorgejoon
    čurgiđ+V+Imprt+Du2: čorgejee
    čurgiđ+V+Imprt+Du3: čorgejus
    čurgiđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: čorgejop
    čurgiđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: čurgiđ
    čurgiđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: čorgejus
    čurgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: čurgii
    čurgiđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: čurgim
    čurgiđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: čurgiiččii
    čurgiđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: čurgiižii
    čurgiđ+V+PrsPrc: [čorgejeijee, čorgejijjee]
    čurgiđ+V+PrfPrc: čurgim
    čurgiđ+V+Actio: čurgim
    čurgiđ+V+Actio+Ess: čurgiimin
    čurgiđ+V+Actio+Loc: čurgiimist
    čurgiđ+V+Actio+Ill: čurgiimân
    čurgiđ+V+Ger: čurgiidijn
    čurgiđ+V+VAbess: čurgiihánnáá
    
    
      Verb - huksiđ: # 
    huksiđ+V+Inf: huksiđ
    huksiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: huksiim
    huksiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: huksiih
    huksiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: huksee
    huksiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: huksejeen
    huksiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: huksiivettee
    huksiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: huksiv
    huksiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: huksip
    huksiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: huksiivetteđ
    huksiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: huksejeh
    huksiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: huksejim
    huksiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: huksejih
    huksiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: huksij
    huksiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: huksijm
    huksiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: huksijd
    huksiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: huksijn
    huksiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: huksijm
    huksiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: huksijd
    huksiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: huksejii
    huksiđ+V+Cond+Sg1: huksiiččim
    huksiđ+V+Cond+Sg2: huksiiččih
    huksiđ+V+Cond+Sg3: huksiiččij
    huksiđ+V+Cond+Du1: huksiiččáim
    huksiđ+V+Cond+Du2: huksiiččáid
    huksiđ+V+Cond+Du3: huksiiččáin
    huksiđ+V+Cond+Pl1: huksiiččijm
    huksiđ+V+Cond+Pl2: huksiiččijd
    huksiđ+V+Cond+Pl3: huksiiččij
    huksiđ+V+Pot+Sg1: huksiižeem
    huksiđ+V+Pot+Sg2: huksiižeeh
    huksiđ+V+Pot+Sg3: huksiš            # huksiž
    huksiđ+V+Pot+Du1: huksiižeen
    huksiđ+V+Pot+Du2: huksišvettee      # huksižvettee
    huksiđ+V+Pot+Du3: huksiižává
    huksiđ+V+Pot+Pl1: huksiižep
    huksiđ+V+Pot+Pl2: huksišvetteđ      # huksižvetteđ 
    huksiđ+V+Pot+Pl3: huksiižeh
    huksiđ+V+Imprt+Sg1: huksejum
    huksiđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: huksii
    huksiđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: huksejus
    huksiđ+V+Imprt+Du1: huksejoon
    huksiđ+V+Imprt+Du2: huksejee
    huksiđ+V+Imprt+Du3: huksejus
    huksiđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: huksejop
    huksiđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: huksiđ
    huksiđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: huksejus
    huksiđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: huksii
    huksiđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: huksim
    huksiđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: huksiiččii
    huksiđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: huksiižii
    huksiđ+V+PrsPrc: [huksejeijee, huksejijjee]
    huksiđ+V+PrfPrc: huksim
    huksiđ+V+Actio: huksim
    huksiđ+V+Actio+Ess: huksiimin
    huksiđ+V+Actio+Loc: huksiimist
    huksiđ+V+Actio+Ill: huksiimân
    huksiđ+V+Ger: huksiidijn
    huksiđ+V+VAbess: huksiihánnáá
    
    
      Verb - salkkiđ: # 
    salkkiđ+V+Inf: salkkiđ
    salkkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: salkkiim
    salkkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: salkkiih
    salkkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sälkkee
    salkkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: sälkkejeen
    salkkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: salkkiivettee
    salkkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: salkkiv
    salkkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: salkkip
    salkkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: salkkiivetteđ
    salkkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: sälkkejeh
    salkkiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: sälkkejim
    salkkiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: sälkkejih
    salkkiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: salkkij
    salkkiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: salkkijm
    salkkiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: salkkijd
    salkkiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: salkkijn
    salkkiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: salkkijm
    salkkiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: salkkijd
    salkkiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: sälkkejii
    salkkiđ+V+Cond+Sg1: salkkiiččim
    salkkiđ+V+Cond+Sg2: salkkiiččih
    salkkiđ+V+Cond+Sg3: salkkiiččij
    salkkiđ+V+Cond+Du1: salkkiiččáim
    salkkiđ+V+Cond+Du2: salkkiiččáid
    salkkiđ+V+Cond+Du3: salkkiiččáin
    salkkiđ+V+Cond+Pl1: salkkiiččijm
    salkkiđ+V+Cond+Pl2: salkkiiččijd
    salkkiđ+V+Cond+Pl3: salkkiiččii
    salkkiđ+V+Pot+Sg1: salkkiižeem
    salkkiđ+V+Pot+Sg2: salkkiižeeh
    salkkiđ+V+Pot+Sg3: salkkiš          # salkkiž
    salkkiđ+V+Pot+Du1: salkkiižeen
    salkkiđ+V+Pot+Du2: salkkišvettee    # salkkižvettee
    salkkiđ+V+Pot+Du3: salkkiižává
    salkkiđ+V+Pot+Pl1: salkkiižep
    salkkiđ+V+Pot+Pl2: salkkišvetteđ    # salkkižvetteđ 
    salkkiđ+V+Pot+Pl3: salkkiižeh
    salkkiđ+V+Imprt+Sg1: sälkkejum
    salkkiđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: salkkii
    salkkiđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: sälkkejus
    salkkiđ+V+Imprt+Du1: sälkkejoon
    salkkiđ+V+Imprt+Du2: sälkkejee
    salkkiđ+V+Imprt+Du3: sälkkejus
    salkkiđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: sälkkejop
    salkkiđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: salkkiđ
    salkkiđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: sälkkejus
    salkkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: salkkii
    salkkiđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: salkkim
    salkkiđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: salkkiiččii
    salkkiđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: salkkiižii
    salkkiđ+V+PrsPrc: [sälkkejeijee, sälkkejijjee]
    salkkiđ+V+PrfPrc: salkkim
    salkkiđ+V+Actio: salkkim
    salkkiđ+V+Actio+Ess: salkkiimin
    salkkiđ+V+Actio+Loc: salkkiimist
    salkkiđ+V+Actio+Ill: salkkiimân
    salkkiđ+V+Ger: salkkiidijn
    salkkiđ+V+VAbess: salkkiihánnáá
    
    
      Verb - luodˊdiđ: # 
    luodˊdiđ+V+Inf: luodˊdiđ
    luodˊdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: luodˊdiim
    luodˊdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: luodˊdiih
    luodˊdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: lyedˊdee
    luodˊdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: lyedˊdejeen
    luodˊdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: luodˊdiivettee
    luodˊdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: luodˊdiv
    luodˊdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: luodˊdip
    luodˊdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: luodˊdiivetteđ
    luodˊdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: lyedˊdejeh
    luodˊdiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: lyedˊdejim
    luodˊdiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: lyedˊdejih
    luodˊdiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: luodˊdij
    luodˊdiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: luodˊdijm
    luodˊdiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: luodˊdijd
    luodˊdiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: luodˊdijn
    luodˊdiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: luodˊdijm
    luodˊdiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: luodˊdijd
    luodˊdiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: lyedˊdejii
    luodˊdiđ+V+Cond+Sg1: luodˊdiiččim
    luodˊdiđ+V+Cond+Sg2: luodˊdiiččih
    luodˊdiđ+V+Cond+Sg3: luodˊdiiččij
    luodˊdiđ+V+Cond+Du1: luodˊdiiččáim
    luodˊdiđ+V+Cond+Du2: luodˊdiiččáid
    luodˊdiđ+V+Cond+Du3: luodˊdiiččáin
    luodˊdiđ+V+Cond+Pl1: luodˊdiiččijm
    luodˊdiđ+V+Cond+Pl2: luodˊdiiččijd
    luodˊdiđ+V+Cond+Pl3: luodˊdiiččii
    luodˊdiđ+V+Pot+Sg1: luodˊdiižeem
    luodˊdiđ+V+Pot+Sg2: luodˊdiižeeh
    luodˊdiđ+V+Pot+Sg3: luodˊdiš            # luodˊdiž
    luodˊdiđ+V+Pot+Du1: luodˊdiižeen
    luodˊdiđ+V+Pot+Du2: luodˊdišvettee      # luodˊdižvettee
    luodˊdiđ+V+Pot+Du3: luodˊdiižává
    luodˊdiđ+V+Pot+Pl1: luodˊdiižep
    luodˊdiđ+V+Pot+Pl2: luodˊdišvetteđ      # luodˊdižvetteđ
    luodˊdiđ+V+Pot+Pl3: luodˊdiižeh
    luodˊdiđ+V+Imprt+Sg1: lyedˊdejum
